Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.140

Transfers and payments into revolving fund—Limitation on employment security department payments—Allotment by director of financial management—Disbursements from fund by voucher.

The amounts to be disbursed from the administrative hearings revolving fund from time to time shall be transferred thereto by the state treasurer from funds appropriated to any and all agencies for administrative hearings expenses on a quarterly basis. Agencies operating in whole or in part from nonappropriated funds shall pay into the administrative hearings revolving fund such funds as will fully reimburse funds appropriated to the office of administrative hearings for any services provided activities financed by nonappropriated funds. The funds from the employment security department for the administrative hearings services provided by the office of administrative hearings shall not exceed that portion of the resources provided to the employment security department by the department of labor, employment and training administration, for such administrative hearings services. To satisfy department of labor funding requirements, the office of administrative hearings shall meet or exceed timeliness standards under federal regulations in the conduct of employment security department appeals.

The director of financial management shall allot all such funds to the office of administrative hearings for the operation of the office, pursuant to appropriation, in the same manner as appropriated funds are allocated to other agencies under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Disbursements from the administrative hearings revolving fund shall be pursuant to vouchers executed by the chief administrative law judge or his or her designee.

[ 2011 c 336 s 764; 1982 c 189 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 189: See note following RCW 34.12.020.